en: Pickled white cabbage, marinated white cabbage
fr: Chou blanc mariné, Choux blancs marinés

en: Celery stalks pickles, marinated celery stalks
fr: Céleri-branche mariné

en: Pumpkin pickles, marinated pumpkin
fr: Potiron mariné

en: Squash pickles, marinated squash
fr: Courge marinée

en: Pickled sweet corn, sweet corn pickles, marinated sweet corn
fr: Épis de maïs marinés, Maïs doux mariné

en: Turnips pickles
fr: Navets marinés

en: Bamboo shoots pickles, marinated bamboo shoots
fr: Pousses de bambou marinées

en: Radish pickles, marinated radishes
fr: Radis marinés

en: Red radish pickles, marinated red radishes
fr: Radis rouges marinés, Radis roses marinés

en: Pickled tomatoes, marinated tomatoes
fr: Tomates marinées

en: Torshi
fr: Torchi

en: Pickled fruits, Fruit pickles
fr: Pickles de fruits, fruits marinés

en: Pickled mangoes, marinated mangoes
fr: Pickles de mangues, mangues marinées

en: Pickled plums, marinated plums
fr: Pickles de prunes, prunes marinées

en: Pickled limes, marinated limes
fr: Pickles de citrons verts, citrons verts marinées

en: Fresh vegetables
bg: Пресни зеленчуци
ca: Vegetals frescos
da: Friske grøntsager
de: frisches Gemüse
es: Verduras y hortalizas frescas, Verduras frescas, Hortalizas frescas
fi: Tuoreet vihannekset
fr: Légumes frais
he: ירקות טריים
hr: Svježe povrće
hu: Friss zöldségek
it: Verdure fresche
nl: Verse groenten
pt: Vegetais frescos
ru: Свежие овощи
sv: Färska grönsaker
zh: 新鲜蔬菜

en: Sorrel
fr: Oseille

en: Fresh sorrel, Raw sorrel
fr: Oseille crue

en: Jerusalem artichoke
fr: Topinambour
hr: Jeruzalemska artičoka
ja: キクイモ
nl: Aardperen, Aardpeer

en: Cooked Jerusalem artichoke
fr: Topinambour cuit